California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 13.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10271.1.

(a) (1) Supplemental benefits that operate to safeguard life insurance contracts against lapse are defined as a waiver of premium benefit or a waiver of monthly deduction benefit, as applicable, in which the insurer waives the premium or monthly deduction for a life insurance contract when the insured becomes totally disabled, as defined by the supplemental benefit, and where the waiver continues until the end of the insured’s disability, or for the period specified by the supplemental benefit, consistent with paragraph (5).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, total disability shall not be less favorable to the insured than the following:

(A) During the first 24 months of total disability, the insured is unable to perform with reasonable continuity the substantial and material duties of their job due to sickness or bodily injury.

(B) After the first 24 months of total disability, the insured, due to sickness or bodily injury, is unable to engage with reasonable continuity in any other job in which they could reasonably be expected to perform satisfactorily in light of their age, education, training, experience, station in life, or physical and mental capacity.

(3) The definition of total disability may also include presumptive total disability, such as the insured’s total and permanent loss of sight of both eyes, hearing of both ears, speech, the use of both
 hands, both feet, or one hand and one foot.

(4) The insurer may require total disability to continue for an uninterrupted period of time specified by the supplemental benefit, or the insurer may allow separate periods of disability to be combined.

(5) The waiver of premium or monthly deduction benefit shall continue for the period specified by the supplemental benefit, but shall not be less favorable to the insured than the following:

(A) If the insured’s total disability begins before the insured attains 60 years of age, the insurer shall waive all premiums or monthly deductions due for the period that the insured continues to be totally disabled, except as follows:

(i) For
 group life insurance policies, if the insured’s total disability begins before the insured attains 60 years of age, the insurer shall waive all premiums or monthly deductions due for the period of total disability up to 65 years of age. This subdivision does not preclude the insurer from extending a supplemental benefit for longer periods.

(ii) When a renewal is offered for a group life insurance policy that was issued prior to January 1, 2017, and contains a supplemental benefit described in this subparagraph, the insurer shall offer to renew the policy with a continuation of the in-force supplemental benefit, and may concurrently offer the group policyholder the option to change the supplemental benefit as described in clause (i).

(B) If the insured’s total disability begins
 after the age specified in subparagraph (A), the insurer shall waive all premiums or monthly deductions due for the period that the insured continues to be totally disabled up to 65 years of age, except as follows:

(i) For group life insurance policies, if the insured’s total disability begins on or after the date the insured attains 60 years of age, the insurer is not required to waive premiums or monthly deductions. This subdivision does not preclude the insurer from extending a supplemental benefit for longer periods.

(ii) When a renewal is offered for a group life insurance policy that was issued prior to January 1, 2017, and contains a supplemental benefit described in this subparagraph, the insurer shall offer to renew the policy with a continuation of the in-force supplemental
 benefit, and may concurrently offer the group policyholder the option to change the supplemental benefit as described in clause (i).

(6) In addition to the permissible exclusions listed in subdivision (g) of Section 10271, the insurer may exclude a total disability occurring after the policy anniversary or supplemental contract anniversary, as applicable and as defined by the supplemental benefit, on which the insured attains a specified age of no less than 65 years.

(b) “Special surrender benefit” means a “waiver of surrender charge benefit” wherein the insurer waives the surrender charge usually charged for a withdrawal of funds from the cash value of a life insurance contract or the account value of an annuity contract if the owner, insured, or annuitant, as applicable, meets
 any of the following criteria:

(1) The individual develops a terminal illness, as defined in subdivision (d).

(2) The individual is receiving, as prescribed by a physician, registered nurse, or licensed social worker, home care or community-based services, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10232.9, or is confined in a skilled nursing facility, convalescent nursing home, or extended care facility, which shall not be defined more restrictively than as in the Medicare program, or is confined in a residential care facility or residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in the Health and Safety Code. Out-of-state providers of services shall be defined as comparable in licensure and staffing requirements to California providers.

(3) The individual has any medical condition that would, in the absence of treatment, result in death within a limited period of time, as defined by the supplemental benefit, but that shall not be restricted to a period of less than six months.

(4) (A) The individual is totally disabled, as follows:

(i) During the first 24 months of total disability, the owner, insured, or annuitant, as applicable, is unable to perform with reasonable continuity the substantial and material duties of their job due to sickness or bodily injury.

(ii) After the first 24 months of total disability, the owner, insured, or annuitant, as applicable, due to sickness or
 bodily injury, is unable to engage with reasonable continuity in any other job in which they could reasonably be expected to perform satisfactorily in light of their age, education, training, experience, station in life, or physical and mental capacity.

(B) The definition of total disability may also include presumptive total disability, such as the insured’s total and permanent loss of sight of both eyes, hearing of both ears, speech, the use of both hands, both feet, or one hand and one foot.

(C) The insurer may require the total disability to continue for an uninterrupted period of time specified by the supplemental benefit, or the insurer may allow separate periods of disability to be combined.

(5) The
 individual has a chronic illness as defined in either subparagraph (A) or (B):

(A) Either of the following:

(i) Impairment in performing two out of seven activities of daily living, as set forth in subdivisions (a) and (g) of Section 10232.8, meaning the insured needs human assistance, or needs continual substantial supervision.

(ii) The insured has an impairment of cognitive ability, meaning a deterioration or loss of intellectual capacity due to mental illness or disease, including Alzheimer’s disease or related illnesses, that requires continual supervision to protect oneself or others.

(B) Either of the following:

(i) Impairment in performing two out of six activities of daily living as described in subdivisions (b), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 10232.8 due to a loss of functional capacity to perform the activity.

(ii) Impairment of cognitive ability, meaning the insured needs substantial supervision due to severe cognitive impairment, as described in subdivisions (b), (d), and (e) of Section 10232.8.

(6) The individual has become involuntarily or voluntarily unemployed.

(c) “Supplemental benefit” means a rider to or provision in a life insurance policy, certificate, or annuity contract that provides a benefit as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 10271.

(d) “Terminal illness benefit” means a provision, endorsement, or rider added to a life insurance policy that provides for the advance payment of any part of the death proceeds, payable upon the occurrence of a terminal illness. For the purposes of this chapter, “terminal illness” means a medical condition in which the owner’s, insured’s, or annuitant’s life expectancy is expected to be less than or equal to a limited period of time that shall not be restricted to a period of less than 12 months or greater than 24 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 14.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10272.

The term “indemnity,” as used in this chapter means benefits promised.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.

The term “noncancelable policy” or “noncancelable and guaranteed renewable policy” as used in this chapter means a policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums in the amount originally set forth in the policy (a) until at least age 50, or (b) in the case of a policy issued after age 44, for at least five years from its date of issue, during which period the insurer has no right to make unilaterally any change in any provision of the policy while the policy is in force. Such a policy may use any of the provisions in Section 10291.6, 10350.2, 10350.4 or 10369.7, which may be used in noncancelable policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2047.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.3.

The term “guaranteed renewable policy” as used in this chapter (commencing with Section 10270) means a policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premium (a) until at least age 50, or (b) in the case of a policy issued after age 44, for at least five years from its date of issue during which period the insurer has no right to make unilaterally any change in any provision of the policy while the policy is in force, except that the insurer may, in accordance with the provisions of the policy, make changes in premium rates as to all insureds who were placed in the same class for purposes of rate determination in the process of issuance of the policy or making it guaranteed renewable. Such a policy may use any of the provisions in Section 10291.6, 10350.2, 10350.4 or 10369.7, which may be used in noncancelable policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2047.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.4.

All disability insurers writing, issuing, or administering group health benefit plans shall make all of these health benefit plans renewable with respect to the policyholder, contractholder, or employer except in case of the following:

(a) (1) Nonpayment of the required premiums by the policyholder, contractholder, or employer if the policyholder, contractholder, or employer has been duly notified and billed for the premium and at least a 30-day grace period has elapsed since the date of notification or, if longer, the period of time required for notice and any other requirements pursuant to Section 2703, 2712, or 2742 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Secs.
 300gg-2, 300gg-12, and 300gg-42) and any subsequent rules or regulations has elapsed.

(2) Pursuant to paragraph (1), the disability insurer shall continue to provide coverage as required by the policyholder’s, certificate holder’s, or other insured’s policy during the period described in paragraph (1).

(b) The insurer demonstrates fraud or an intentional misrepresentation of material fact under the terms of the policy by the policyholder, contractholder, or employer.

(c) Violation of a material contract provision relating to employer or other group contribution or group participation rates by the contractholder or employer.

(d) The insurer ceases to provide or arrange for the provision of health care services for new group health benefit plans in this
 state, provided that the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Notice of the decision to cease writing, issuing, or administering new or existing group health benefit plans in this state is provided to the commissioner and to either the policyholder, contractholder, or employer at least 180 days prior to discontinuation of that coverage.

(2) Group health benefit plans shall not be canceled for 180 days after the date of the notice required under paragraph (1) and for that business of a plan that remains in force, any disability insurer that ceases to write, issue, or administer new group health benefit plans shall continue to be governed by this section with respect to business conducted under this section.

(3) Except as provided under subdivision (h) of Section 10705, or unless the commissioner had made a
 determination pursuant to Section 10712, a disability insurer that ceases to write, issue, or administer new group health benefit plans in this state after the effective date of this section shall be prohibited from writing, issuing, or administering new group health benefit plans to employers in this state for a period of five years from the date of notice to the commissioner.

(e) The disability insurer withdraws a group health benefit plan from the market; provided, that the plan notifies all affected contractholders, policyholders, or employers and the commissioner at least 90 days prior to the discontinuation of the health benefit plans, and that the insurer makes available to the contractholder, policyholder, or employer all health benefit plans that it makes available to new employer business without regard to the claims experience of health-related factors of insureds or individuals who may become eligible for the coverage.

(f) If the coverage is offered through a network plan, there is no longer any covered individual in connection with the plan who lives, resides, or works in the service area of the disability insurer.

(g) If coverage is made available in the individual market through a bona fide association, the membership of the individual in the association on the basis of which the coverage is provided, ceases, but only if that coverage is terminated under this subdivision uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of covered individuals.

(h) For the purposes of this section, “health benefit plan” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6 and Section 10198.61.

(i) For the purposes of this section, “eligible employee” shall
 have the same meaning as in Section 10700, except that it applies to all health benefit plans issued to employer groups of two or more employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 658, Sec. 11.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.5.

No person shall cause or permit to be issued, circulated or used any representation that a policy defined in Section 10273.3 is “non-can,” noncancelable (not cancelable) or noncancelable and guaranteed renewable.

No person shall cause or permit to be issued, circulated or used any representation concerning the right to continue a policy such as is defined in Section 10273.3 unless such representation contains a declaration of the terms under which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium in a manner which shall not minimize or obscure the same.

Any person knowingly violating any provision of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided for misrepresentation by this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2047.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.6.

All individual health benefit plans shall be renewable with respect to all eligible individuals or dependents at the option of the individual except as follows:

(a) (1) Except as otherwise specified in paragraph (3), for nonpayment of the required premiums by the individual if the individual has been duly notified and billed for the premium and at least a 30-day grace period has elapsed since the date of notification or, if longer, the period of time required for notice and any other requirements pursuant to Section 2703, 2712, or 2742 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Secs. 300gg-2, 300gg-12, and 300gg-42) and subsequent rules or regulations has elapsed.

(2) Pursuant to paragraph (1), the disability insurer shall continue to provide coverage as required by the policyholder’s, certificate holder’s, or other insured’s policy during the period described in paragraph (1).

(3) For nonpayment of the required premiums by an individual who receives advance payments of the premium tax credit authorized by Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code or advanced premium assistance subsidy authorized by Section 100800 of the Government Code, or both, if the individual has been duly notified and billed for the charge and a grace period of three consecutive months has elapsed since the last day of paid coverage.

(A) During the first month of the three-month grace period described
 in paragraph (3), an insurer shall continue to do both of the following:

(i) Collect advance payments of the federal premium tax credit or state advanced premium assistance subsidy, or both, on behalf of the insured.

(ii) Provide coverage as required by the individual’s policy.

(B) If the individual exhausts the three-month grace period described in paragraph (3) without paying all outstanding premiums due, the insurer shall return both of the following:

(i) Advance payments of the premium tax credit paid on behalf of the individual for the second and third months of the three-month grace period described in paragraph (3), pursuant to Section 156.270(e)(2)
 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) The advanced premium assistance subsidy paid on behalf of the individual for the second and third months of the three-month grace period described in paragraph (3), pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100805 of the Government Code.

(C) An insurer shall comply with all federal and state laws and regulations relating to cancellations, terminations, or nonrenewals of coverage due to nonpayment of premiums by individuals who receive advance payments of the federal premium tax credit or state advanced premium assistance subsidy. For a health insurance contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2020, all requirements applicable to cancellations, terminations, or nonrenewals of coverage due to nonpayment of premiums by
 individuals who receive advance payments of premium tax credit authorized by Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to cancellations, terminations, or nonrenewals of coverage due to nonpayment of premiums by individuals who receive premium assistance subsidy authorized by Section 100800 of the Government Code.

(b) The insurer demonstrates fraud or intentional misrepresentation of material fact under the terms of the policy by the individual.

(c) Movement of the individual contractholder outside the service area, but only if coverage is terminated uniformly without regard to a health status-related factor of covered individuals.

(d) If the disability insurer ceases to provide or arrange for
 the provision of health care services for new individual health benefit plans in this state, as long as the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Notice of the decision to cease new or existing individual health benefit plans in this state is provided to the commissioner and to the individual policy or contractholder at least 180 days before discontinuation of that coverage.

(2) Individual health benefit plans shall not be canceled for 180 days after the date of the notice required under paragraph (1) and for that business of a disability insurer that remains in force, a disability insurer that ceases to offer for sale new individual health benefit plans shall continue to be governed by this section with respect to business conducted under this section.

(3) A disability insurer that ceases to write new individual health benefit plans in this state after the effective date of this section shall be prohibited from offering for sale individual health benefit plans in this state for a period of five years from the date of notice to the commissioner.

(e) If the disability insurer withdraws an individual health benefit plan from the market, as long as the disability insurer notifies all affected individuals and the commissioner at least 90 days before the discontinuation of these plans, and the disability insurer makes available to the individual all health benefit plans that it makes available to new individual businesses without regard to a health status-related factor of enrolled individuals or individuals who may become eligible for
 the coverage.

(f) If coverage is made available in the individual market through a bona fide association, and the membership of the individual in the association on the basis of which the coverage is provided ceases, but only if that coverage is terminated under this subdivision uniformly without regard to a health status-related factor of covered individuals.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “health benefit plan” has the same meaning as in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6 and Section 10198.61.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 15.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.7.

(a) A policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured who alleges that a policy or coverage has been or will be canceled, rescinded, or not renewed in violation of Section 10713, 10273.4, 10273.6, 10384.17, or 10384, or any regulations promulgated thereunder, may request a review by the commissioner.

(b) If the commissioner determines that a proper complaint exists, the commissioner shall notify the insurer and the policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured. The insurer shall either request a hearing or reinstate the policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured.

(c) If, after review, the commissioner determines that the
 cancellation, rescission, or failure to renew is contrary to existing law, the commissioner shall order the insurer to reinstate the policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured. Within 15 days after receipt of that order, the insurer shall either request a hearing or reinstate the policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured.

(d) If a policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured requests a review of the insurer’s determination to cancel, rescind, or failure to renew the policyholder’s, certificate holder’s, or other insured’s policy or coverage pursuant to subdivision (a), the insurer shall continue to provide coverage to the policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured under the terms of the contract or policy until a final determination of the policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured’s request for review has been made by the commissioner. This subdivision shall not apply if the insurer cancels the policy or
 coverage for nonpayment of premiums pursuant to Section 10713, 10273.4, 10273.6, 10384.17, or 10384, or any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(e) A reinstatement pursuant to this section shall be retroactive to the time of cancellation, rescission, or failure to renew and the insurer shall be liable for the expenses incurred by the policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured for covered health care services from the date of cancellation, rescission, or nonrenewal to and including the date of reinstatement. The insurer shall reimburse the policyholder, certificate holder, or insured for any expenses incurred pursuant to this subdivision within 30 days of receipt of the completed claim.

(f) This section shall not abrogate any preexisting contracts or policies entered into prior to January 1, 2011, between a policyholder, certificate holder, or other insured and an insurer,
 except that each insurer shall, if directed to do so by the commissioner, exercise its authority, if any, under any such preexisting contracts or policies to conform them to the provisions of existing law.

(g) On or before July 1, 2011, the commissioner may issue guidance regarding compliance with this section and Sections 10713, 10273.4, 10273.6, 10384.17, and 10384, or any regulations promulgated under those provisions. The guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The guidance shall only be effective through December 31, 2013, or until the commissioner adopts and effects regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, whichever occurs first.

(h) To the extent required by Section 2719 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 300gg-19) and any subsequent rules or regulations, there shall be an independent external review pursuant to the standards required by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services of an insurer’s cancellation, rescission, or nonrenewal of a policyholder’s, certificate holder’s, or other insured’s coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 658, Sec. 13.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10274.

The term “endorsement” as used in this chapter means any amendment, change, limitation, alteration or restriction of the printed text of a policy by a rider upon a separate piece of paper made a part of such policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10275.

The term “policy of accident and sickness insurance” as used in this chapter includes any policy or contract covering the kind or kinds of insurance described in Section 106.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10276.

Every individual accident and health policy or contract, except single premium nonrenewable policies or contracts, issued for delivery in this state on or after July 1, 1962, by an insurance company, nonprofit hospital service plan or medical service corporation, shall have printed thereon or attached thereto a notice stating that the person to whom the policy or contract is issued shall be permitted to return the policy or contract after its delivery to the purchaser and to have the premium paid refunded if, after examination of the policy or contract, the purchaser is not satisfied with it for any reason. The period time set forth by the insurer, nonprofit hospital service plan or medical service corporation for return of the policy or contract shall be clearly stated on the notice and such period shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 30 days. The policyholder or purchaser may return the policy or contract to the insurer, plan or corporation at any time during the period specified in the notice. If a policyholder or purchaser pursuant to such notice, returns the policy or contract to the company or association at its home or branch office or to the agent through whom it was purchased, it shall be void from the beginning and the parties shall be in the same position as if no policy or contract had been issued.

This section shall apply to all policies or contracts subject to this section and issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1981. All policies or contracts subject to this section which are in effect on January 1, 1981, shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in any such policy or contract which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.

(a) A group health insurance policy that provides that coverage of a dependent child of an employee or other member of the covered group shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the policy, shall also provide that attainment of the limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of the child while the child is and continues to meet both of the following criteria:

(1) Incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of a physically or mentally disabling injury, illness, or condition.

(2) Chiefly dependent upon the employee or member for support and maintenance.

(b) The insurer shall notify the employee or member that the dependent child’s coverage will terminate upon attainment of the limiting age unless the employee or member submits proof of the criteria described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) to the insurer within 60 days of the date of receipt of the notification. The insurer shall send this notification to the employee or member at least 90 days prior to the date the child attains the limiting age. Upon receipt of a request by the employee or member for continued coverage of the child and proof of the criteria described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the insurer shall determine whether the dependent child meets that criteria before the child attains the limiting age. If the insurer fails to make the determination by that date, it shall continue coverage of the child pending its determination.

(c) The
 insurer may subsequently request information about a dependent child whose coverage is continued beyond the limiting age under subdivision (a), but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the child’s attainment of the limiting age.

(d) If the employee or member changes carriers to another insurer or to a health care service plan, the new insurer or plan shall continue to provide coverage for the dependent child. The new plan or insurer may request information about the dependent child initially and not more frequently than annually thereafter to determine if the child continues to satisfy the criteria in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). The employee or member shall submit the information requested by the new plan or insurer within 60 days of receiving the request.

(e) If a group health insurance policy provides coverage for a dependent child
 who is over 26 years of age and enrolled as a full-time student at a secondary or postsecondary educational institution, the following shall apply:

(1) Any break in the school calendar shall not disqualify the dependent child from coverage.

(2) If the dependent child takes a medical leave of absence, and the nature of the dependent child’s injury, illness, or condition would render the dependent child incapable of self-sustaining employment, the provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply if the dependent child is chiefly dependent on the policyholder for support and maintenance.

(3) (A) If the dependent child takes a medical leave of absence from school, but the nature of the dependent child’s injury, illness, or condition does not meet the requirements of paragraph (2), the dependent child’s
 coverage shall not terminate for a period not to exceed 12 months or until the date on which the coverage is scheduled to terminate pursuant to the terms and conditions of the policy, whichever comes first. The period of coverage under this paragraph shall commence on the first day of the medical leave of absence from the school or on the date the physician determines the illness prevented the dependent child from attending school, whichever comes first. Any break in the school calendar shall not disqualify the dependent child from coverage under this paragraph.

(B) Documentation or certification of the medical necessity for a leave of absence from school shall be submitted to the insurer at least 30 days prior to the medical leave of absence from the school, if the medical reason for the absence and the absence are foreseeable, or 30 days after the start date of the medical leave of absence from school and shall be considered prima facie
 evidence of entitlement to coverage under this paragraph.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to a policy of specialized health insurance, Medicare supplement insurance, CHAMPUS-supplement or TRICARE-supplement insurance policies, or to hospital-only, accident-only, or specified disease insurance policies that reimburse for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits.

(f) (1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), under no circumstances shall the limiting age under a group or individual health insurance policy that provides coverage of a dependent child be less than 26 years of age with respect to policy years beginning on or after September 23, 2010. 

(2) For policy years beginning before January 1, 2014, a group health insurance policy that qualifies as a grandfathered health plan under Section
 1251 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and that makes available dependent coverage of children may exclude from coverage an adult child who has not attained the age of 26 years only if the adult child is eligible to enroll in an eligible employer-sponsored health plan, as defined in Section 5000A(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, other than a group health plan or policy of a parent.

(3) (A) With respect to a child (i) whose coverage under a group or individual health insurance policy ended, or who was denied or not eligible for coverage under a group or individual health insurance policy, because under the terms of the policy the availability of dependent coverage of children ended before the attainment of 26 years of age, and (ii) who becomes eligible for that coverage by reason of the application of this subdivision, the health insurer shall give the child an opportunity to
 enroll that shall continue for at least 30 days. This opportunity and the notice described in subparagraph (B) shall be provided not later than the first day of the first policy year beginning on or after September 23, 2010, consistent with the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any additional federal guidance or regulations issued by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(B) The health insurer shall provide written notice stating that a dependent described in subparagraph (A) who has not attained the age of 26 years is eligible to apply for coverage. This notice may be provided to the dependent’s parent on behalf of the dependent. If the notice is included with enrollment
 materials for a group policy, the notice shall be prominent.

(C) In the case of an individual who enrolls under this paragraph, coverage shall take effect no later than the first day of the first policy year beginning on or after September 23, 2010.

(D) A dependent enrolling in coverage under a group policy pursuant to this paragraph shall be treated as a special enrollee as provided under the rules of Section 146.117(d) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The health insurer shall offer the recipient of the notice all of the benefit packages available to similarly situated individuals who did not lose coverage by reason of cessation of dependent status. Any difference in benefit or cost-sharing requirements shall constitute a different benefit package. A dependent enrolling in coverage under a group policy pursuant to this paragraph shall not be required to pay more
 for coverage than similarly situated individuals who did not lose coverage by reason of cessation of dependent status.

(4) Nothing in this section shall require a health insurer to make coverage available for a child of a child receiving dependent coverage. Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify the definition of “dependent” as used in the Revenue and Taxation Code with respect to the tax treatment of the cost of coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 660, Sec. 2.   (SB 1088)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10278.

(a) An individual health insurance policy that provides that coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the policy, shall also provide that attainment of the limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of the child while the child is and continues to meet both of the following criteria:

(1) Incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of a physically or mentally disabling injury, illness, or condition.

(2) Chiefly dependent upon the policyholder or subscriber for support and maintenance.

(b) The insurer shall notify the policyholder or subscriber that the dependent child’s coverage will terminate upon attainment of the limiting age unless the policyholder or subscriber submits proof of the criteria described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) to the insurer within 60 days of the date of receipt of the notification. The insurer shall send this notification to the policyholder or subscriber at least 90 days prior to the date the child attains the limiting age. Upon receipt of a request by the policyholder or subscriber for continued coverage of the child and proof of the criteria described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the insurer shall determine whether the dependent child meets that criteria before the child attains the limiting age. If the insurer fails to make the determination by that date, it shall continue coverage of the child pending its determination.

(c) The insurer may subsequently request information about a dependent child whose coverage is continued beyond the limiting age under subdivision (a), but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the child’s attainment of the limiting age.

(d) If the subscriber or policyholder changes carriers to another insurer or to a health care service plan, the new insurer or plan shall continue to provide coverage for the dependent child. The new plan or insurer may request information about the dependent child initially and not more frequently than annually thereafter to determine if the child continues to satisfy the criteria in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). The subscriber or policyholder shall submit the information requested by the new plan or insurer within 60 days of receiving the request.

(e) If an individual health insurance policy provides coverage for a dependent child who is over 18 years of age and enrolled as a full-time student at a secondary or postsecondary educational institution, the following shall apply:

(1) Any break in the school calendar shall not disqualify the dependent child from coverage.

(2) If the dependent child takes a medical leave of absence, and the nature of the dependent child’s injury, illness, or condition would render the dependent child incapable of self-sustaining employment, the provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply if the dependent child is chiefly dependent on the policyholder for support and maintenance.

(3) (A) If the dependent child takes a medical leave of absence from school, but the nature of the dependent child’s injury, illness, or condition does not meet the requirements of paragraph (2), the dependent child’s coverage shall not terminate for a period not to exceed 12 months or until the date on which the coverage is scheduled to terminate pursuant to the terms and conditions of the policy, whichever comes first. The period of coverage under this paragraph shall commence on the first day of the medical leave of absence from the school or on the date the physician determines the illness prevented the dependent child from attending school, whichever comes first. Any break in the school calendar shall not disqualify the dependent child from coverage under this paragraph.
